Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 3. Real Estate Subdivisions

Powers. —

A subdivision developer who alleged that he had an entitlement or right to obtain approval of his subdivision, as originally proposed and without restrictions from a board of county commissioners, failed to identify a clearly established statutory or constitutional right that had been violated. Marshall v. Board of County Comm'rs, 912 F. Supp. 1456, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 761 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Applied

in

McClellan v. State, 933 P.2d 461,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1997).

Cited

in

Snake River Venture v. Board of County Comm'rs, 616 P.2d 744,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 18-5-301.
Authority vested in board of county commissioners.

The regulation and control of the subdivision of land in the unincorporated areas in each county is vested in the board of county commissioners of the county in which the land is located. Nothing in this article shall contravene or limit the authority of any county to regulate and control the subdivision of land pursuant to the provisions of W.S.

18-5-201

through

18-5-207

.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 176, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Applied

in

Marshall v. Board of County Comm'rs, 912 F. Supp. 1456, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 761 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Quoted

in

Pickle v. Board of County Comm'rs, 764 P.2d 262,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Pedro/Aspen, Ltd. v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2004 WY 84, 94 P.3d 412,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(2004).

§ 18-5-302.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

“Board” means the board of county commissioners of the county in which the land sought to be subdivided is located;

“Encumbrance” means a mortgage or other lien of record, securing or evidencing indebtedness and affecting land to be subdivided including liens for labor and materials. Taxes and assessments levied by public authority are not an encumbrance under this article except such taxes and assessments as may be delinquent;

“Person” means a natural person, firm, corporation, partnership, or association, or any combination of the above, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“Sell” or “sale” includes sale as evidenced by the delivery of a deed, contract for deed, lease, assignment, auction or award by lottery concerning a subdivision or any part of a subdivision. “Sell” or “sale” does not include a contract to sell which is expressly contingent upon the recording of the final plat by the county clerk, if all funds paid by the buyer under the contract are escrowed with a financial institution located in this state or a title company licensed to do business in this state until the final plat is recorded and the seller tenders the deed or the contract to sell is cancelled or the buyer and seller agree otherwise in writing;

“Subdivider” means any person who lays out any subdivision or parts thereof either for the account of the subdivider or others;

“Subdivision” means the creation or division of a lot, tract, parcel or other unit of land for the immediate or future purpose of sale, building development or redevelopment, for residential, recreational, industrial, commercial or public uses. The word “subdivide” or any derivative thereof shall have reference to the term subdivision, including mobile home courts, the creation of which constitutes a subdivision of land;

“Sewage system” means all pipelines, conduits, pumping stations, force mains and other constructions used for collecting or conducting wastes to a treatment plant or disposal system; any plant or other works used for the purpose of treating, stabilizing or holding wastes; and any system used for disposing of wastes, either by surface or underground methods, including any treatment plant, disposal wells and absorption fields;

“Water supply system” includes development of the source and all structures for conveyance of raw water to the treatment plant or delivery systems; all water treatment plants including disinfection facilities; water supply systems used for irrigation and stock water; and all finished water delivery systems including pipelines, pumping stations and finished water storage facilities;

“Parcel” means a contiguous piece of property lawfully created or conveyed of record as a single piece of property.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 176, § 11; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2000, ch. 95, § 1; 2001, ch. 208, § 1; 2008, ch. 88, § 2; 2009, ch. 59, § 2; 2010, ch. 101, § 1; 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “18-5-317” for “18-5-315” in (a)(i); and inserted (a)(x).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (a)(v) to expand what is and is not included under definitions of “sell” and “sale”; and in (a)(ix), added “water supply systems used for irrigation and stock water,” and deleted “Separate water supply systems used solely for irrigation or stock water are not included” at the end.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a)(x), substituted “lawfully created or conveyed of record as a single piece of property” for “under common ownership.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed (a)(i), which read: “ ‘This article’ means W.S.

18-5-301

through

18-5-317

.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Unlawful subdivision. —

Evidence of a sale that was going to occur after unlawful conveyances had been made was irrelevant to the charges of unlawful subdivision filed against defendant; the later sale was a separate and distinct transaction, completely unrelated to the transactions for which defendant was convicted. McClellan v. State, 933 P.2d 461,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1997).

Evidence was sufficient to support a conviction for unlawful subdivision of land. McClellan v. State, 933 P.2d 461,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 18-5-303.
Exemptions from provisions.

Unless the method of sale or other disposition is adopted for the purpose of evading the provisions of this article, this article shall not apply to the following subdivisions of land however, the following subdivisions are subject to requirements which may be adopted by the board of county commissioners regarding documentation of the proper use and implementation of the following exemptions:

A division of land made outside of platted subdivisions for the purpose of a single gift or sale to a member of the landowner’s immediate family, subject to the following requirements:

A member of the immediate family is limited to any person who is a natural or adopted child, stepchild, spouse, sibling, grandchild, grandparent or parent of the landowner;

The purpose of the division is to provide for the housing, business or agricultural needs of the grantee;

The land shall have been titled in the name of the grantor, or in the name of a trust controlled by the grantor, for a combined period prior to the division of not less than five (5) years for land titled before February 27, 2019, or ten (10) years for land titled on or after February 27, 2019. Parcels created under this paragraph shall be titled in the name of the immediate family member for whom the division is made for a period of not less than five (5) years, or for not less than one (1) year if the parcel was created before February 27, 2019, unless the parcels are subject to involuntary transfer including, but not limited to, foreclosure, death, judicial sale, condemnation or bankruptcy;

No parcel smaller than five (5) acres created under this paragraph shall be further divided unless the owner obtains a subdivision permit pursuant to W.S.

18-5-304

;

Where the landowner is a business entity and eighty percent (80%) of the ownership interest or shares in the business entity are held by, or in the name of a trust controlled by, individuals related by blood or marriage, the sale or gift may be made subject to the provisions of this section to an immediate family member of any shareholder who has owned at least five percent (5%) of the outstanding shares for at least five (5) years continuously before the date of the sale or gift.

A division which may be created by any court of this state pursuant to the law of eminent domain, by operation of law or by order of any court in this state, except that this paragraph shall not exempt a partition of real property pursuant to W.S.

1-32-101

through

1-32-122

from compliance with this article if the division would otherwise be subject to the provisions of this article;

A division which is created by a lien, mortgage, deed of trust or any other security instrument, easements and rights-of-way;

Lands located within incorporated cities or towns;

A division which is created by the sale or other disposition of land to the state of Wyoming or any political subdivision thereof;

A division which affects railroad rights-of-way;

A division which is a sale or other disposition of land for agricultural purposes or affects the alignment of property lines for agricultural purposes;

A division which is created by boundary line adjustments where the parcel subject of the sale or other disposition is adjacent to and merged with other land owned by the grantee;

A division which creates cemetery lots;

A division which is created by the acquisition of an interest in land in the name of the husband and wife or other persons in joint tenancy or as tenants in common, and the interest shall be deemed for purposes of this subsection as only one (1) interest;

A division of land creating a parcel five (5) acres or less for the purpose of establishing unmanned communication facilities, compressor stations, metering stations, fiber optic booster stations or similar unmanned facilities;

A division which creates a cluster development pursuant to and in accordance with article 4 of this chapter;

The sale or disposition of separate parcels of land that were separate when lawfully created or conveyed and which have not been combined by a recorded instrument of conveyance signed by all of the owners.

Except as provided in W.S.

18-5-316

, this article shall not apply to the sale or other disposition of land where the parcels involved are thirty-five (35) acres or larger, subject to the requirement that ingress and egress and utility easements shall be provided to each parcel by binding and recordable easements of not less than forty (40) feet in width to a public road unless specifically waived by the grantee or transferee in a binding and recordable document.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 176, § 12; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2001, ch. 208, § 1; 2003, ch. 4, § 1; 2007, ch. 153, § 1; 2008, ch. 88, § 2; 2009, ch. 58, § 2; 2010, ch. 101, § 1; 2013 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 141, § 1, effective February 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 52, § 1, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (a), inserting requirements to subdivisions, documentation and transfers of land within family corporations.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted the exception at the beginning of (b).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(xii).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (a)(xiii).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the exception in (a)(ii).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a) inserted “or in the name of a trust controlled by the grantor, for a combined” to the first sentence in (i)(C), substituted “business entity” for “corporation”, and inserted “ownership interest or shares in the business entity are held by, or in the name of a trust controlled by,” in (E).

The 2019 amendment,

in (a)(i)(C), substituted “ten (10) years” for “five (5) years” and “five (5) years” for “one (1) year.”

Laws 2019, ch. 141 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 27, 2019.

The 2021 amendment

, rewrote (a)(i)(C), which read, "The land shall have been titled in the name of the grantor, or in the name of a trust controlled by the grantor, for a combined period of not less than ten (10) years prior to the division and parcels created under this paragraph shall be titled in the name of the immediate family member for whom the division is made for a period of not less than five (5) years unless such parcels are subject to involuntary transfer including, but not limited to, foreclosure, death, judicial sale, condemnation or bankruptcy."

Laws 2021, ch. 52, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

County may not require its approval for subdivision of land. —

County's zoning regulation that required the developer to obtain the county's approval of its plan to sell 40-acre parcels exceeded the county's authority to regulate the subdivision of land granted by the Real Estate Subdivisions Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

18-5-301

et seq., because under the express language of this section, counties were not authorized to require county approval for the subdivision of land into parcels greater than 35 acres. Pedro/Aspen, Ltd. v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2004 WY 84, 94 P.3d 412,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2004).

Unlawful subdivision. —

Evidence of a sale that was going to occur after unlawful conveyances had been made was irrelevant to the charges of unlawful subdivision filed against defendant; the later sale was a separate and distinct transaction, completely unrelated to the transactions for which defendant was convicted. McClellan v. State, 933 P.2d 461,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1997).

Evidence was sufficient to support a conviction for unlawful subdivision of land. McClellan v. State, 933 P.2d 461,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 18-5-304.
Subdivision permit required.

No person shall sell land subject to subdivision regulation under this article, record a plat or commence construction of a subdivision without first obtaining a subdivision permit pursuant to W.S.

18-5-306

or, if applicable, W.S.

18-5-316

from the board of the county in which the land is located.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 176, § 13; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2008, ch. 88, § 2; 2009, ch. 59, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, deleted “the physical layout or” preceding “construction” and inserted “pursuant to W.S. 18 5 306 or, if applicable, W.S. 18 5 316.”

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “sell land subject to subdivision regulation under this article, record a plat” for “subdivide land.”

Unlawful subdivision. —

Evidence of a sale that was going to occur after unlawful conveyances had been made was irrelevant to the charges of unlawful subdivision filed against defendant; the later sale was a separate and distinct transaction, completely unrelated to the transactions for which defendant was convicted. McClellan v. State, 933 P.2d 461,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1997).

Evidence was sufficient to support a conviction for unlawful subdivision of land. McClellan v. State, 933 P.2d 461,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1997).

Defendant's multiple convictions and sentences for unlawful subdivision of land did not violate double jeopardy; the case involved three separate illegal transactions with different people and three separate parcels of land, thus making separate charges for each conveyance appropriate. McClellan v. State, 933 P.2d 461,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1997).

Applied

in

Marshall v. Board of County Comm'rs, 912 F. Supp. 1456, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 761 (D. Wyo. 1996); Pedro/Aspen, Ltd. v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2004 WY 84, 94 P.3d 412,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(2004).

§ 18-5-305.
Enforcement; rules and regulations.

Each board shall enforce this article and in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall adopt such rules and regulations as necessary to implement the provisions of and to insure compliance with the intent and purposes of this article.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 176, § 14; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 203.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted “within six (6) months after March 10, 1975” before “adopt such rules.”

Stated

in

Marshall v. Board of County Comm'rs, 912 F. Supp. 1456, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 761 (D. Wyo. 1996).